test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-mâtow_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - mâtow : 

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nimâton   # I cry, I wail, I weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kimâton   # you cry, you wail, you weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: mâtow   # he/she cries, he/she wails, he/she weeps

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-mâtoyân   # as I cry, as I wail, as I weep
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-mâtoyan, î-mâtoyan]   # as you cry, as you wail, as you weep
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-mâtot   # as he/she cries, as he/she wails, as he/she weeps

      # Imp
      mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mâto   # (you) cry now, (you) wail now, (you) weep now
      

      # Prs # Ind
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nimâton   # I cry, I wail, I weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kimâton   # you cry, you wail, you weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: mâtow   # he/she cries, he/she wails, he/she weeps
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nimâtonân   # we cry, we wail, we weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: kimâtonaw   # we and you cry, we and you wail, we and you weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kimâtonâwâw   # you all cry, you all wail, you all weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: mâtowak   # they cry, they wail, they weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: mâtothiwa   # another/others cry, another/others wail, another/others weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Ind+X: [mâtonâniwiw, mâtonâniwan]   # someone cries, someone wails, someone weeps
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-mâtoyân   # as I cry, as I wail, as I weep
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-mâtoyan, î-mâtoyin]   # as you cry, as you wail, as you weep
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-mâtot   # as he/she cries, as he/she wails, as he/she weeps
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-mâtoyâhk   # as we cry, as we wail, as we weep
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-mâtoyahk   # as we and you cry, as we and you wail, as we and you weep
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-mâtoyîk   # as you all cry, as you all wail, as you all weep
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-mâtocik, î-mâtotwâw]   # as they cry, as they wail, as they weep
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-mâtothit   # as another/others cry, as another/others wail, as another/others weep
      PV/î+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-mâtonâniwik, î-mâtonâniwahk, î-mâtohk]   # as someone cries, as someone wails, as someone weeps
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nikî-mâton   # I cried, I wailed, I wept
      PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kikî-mâton   # you cried, you wailed, you wept
      PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: kî-mâtow   # he/she cried, he/she wailed, he/she wept
      PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nikî-mâtonân   # we cried, we wailed, we wept
      PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: kikî-mâtonaw   # we and you cried, we and you wailed, we and you wept
      PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kikî-mâtonâwâw   # you all cried, you all wailed, you all wept
      PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: kî-mâtowak   # they cried, they wailed, they wept
      PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-mâtothiwa   # another/others cried, another/others wailed, another/others wept
      PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+X: [kî-mâtonâniwiw, kî-mâtonâniwan]   # someone cried, someone wailed, someone wept
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-kî-mâtoyân   # as I cried, as I wailed, as I wept
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-kî-mâtoyan, î-kî-mâtoyin]   # as you cried, as you wailed, as you wept
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-mâtot   # as he/she cried, as he/she wailed, as he/she wept
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-kî-mâtoyâhk   # as we cried, as we wailed, as we wept
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-kî-mâtoyahk   # as we and you cried, as we and you wailed, as we and you wept
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-kî-mâtoyîk   # as you all cried, as you all wailed, as you all wept
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-kî-mâtocik, î-kî-mâtotwâw]   # as they cried, as they wailed, as they wept
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-kî-mâtothit   # as another/others cried, as another/others wailed, as another/others wept
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-kî-mâtonâniwik, î-kî-mâtonâniwahk, î-kî-mâtohk]   # as someone cried, as someone wailed, as someone wept
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: niwî-mâton   # I am going to cry, I am going to wail, I am going to weep
      PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kiwî-mâton   # you are going to cry, you are going to wail, you are going to weep
      PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wî-mâtow   # he/she is going to cry, he/she is going to wail, he/she is going to weep
      PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: niwî-mâtonân   # we are going to cry, we are going to wail, we are going to weep
      PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: kiwî-mâtonaw   # we and you are going to cry, we and you are going to wail, we and you are going to weep
      PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kiwî-mâtonâwâw   # you all are going to cry, you all are going to wail, you all are going to weep
      PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: wî-mâtowak   # they are going to cry, they are going to wail, they are going to weep
      PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-mâtothiwa   # another/others are going to cry, another/others are going to wail, another/others are going to weep
      PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+X: [wî-mâtonâniwiw, wî-mâtonâniwan]   # someone is going to cry, someone is going to wail, someone is going to weep
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: î-wî-mâtoyân   # as I am going to cry, as I am going to wail, as I am going to weep
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [î-wî-mâtoyan, î-wî-mâtoyin]   # as you are going to cry, as you are going to wail, as you are going to weep
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-mâtot   # as he/she is going to cry, as he/she is going to wail, as he/she is going to weep
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: î-wî-mâtoyâhk   # as we are going to cry, as we are going to wail, as we are going to weep
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: î-wî-mâtoyahk   # as we and you are going to cry, as we and you are going to wail, as we and you are going to weep
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: î-wî-mâtoyîk   # as you all are going to cry, as you all are going to wail, as you all are going to weep
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [î-wî-mâtocik, î-wî-mâtotwâw]   # as they are going to cry, as they are going to wail, as they are going to weep
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: î-wî-mâtothit   # as another/others are going to cry, as another/others are going to wail, as another/others are going to weep
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+X: [î-wî-mâtonâniwik, î-wî-mâtonâniwahk, î-wî-mâtohk]   # as someone is going to cry, as someone is going to wail, as someone is going to weep
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nika-mâton   # I will cry, I will wail, I will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kika-mâton   # you will cry, you will wail, you will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: ka-mâtow   # he/she will cry, he/she will wail, he/she will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nika-mâtonân   # we will cry, we will wail, we will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+12Pl: kika-mâtonaw   # we and you will cry, we and you will wail, we and you will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kika-mâtonâwâw   # you all will cry, you all will wail, you all will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: ka-mâtowak   # they will cry, they will wail, they will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-mâtothiwa   # another/others will cry, another/others will wail, another/others will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Ind+X: [ka-mâtonâniwiw, ka-mâtonâniwan]   # someone will cry, someone will wail, someone will weep
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ka-mâtoyân   # I will cry, I will wail, I will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ka-mâtoyan, ka-mâtoyin]   # you will cry, you will wail, you will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ka-mâtot   # he/she will cry, he/she will wail, he/she will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ka-mâtoyâhk   # we will cry, we will wail, we will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: ka-mâtoyahk   # we and you will cry, we and you will wail, we and you will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ka-mâtoyîk   # you all will cry, you all will wail, you all will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ka-mâtocik, ka-mâtotwâw]   # they will cry, they will wail, they will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ka-mâtothit   # another/others will cry, another/others will wail, another/others will weep
      PV/ka+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+X: [ka-mâtonâniwik, ka-mâtonâniwahk, ka-mâtohk]   # someone will cry, someone will wail, someone will weep
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: ta-mâtoyân   # I cry, I wail, I weep
      PV/ta+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ta-mâtoyan, ta-mâtoyin]   # you cry, you wail, you weep
      PV/ta+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ta-mâtot   # he/she cries, he/she wails, he/she weeps
      PV/ta+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: ta-mâtoyâhk   # we cry, we wail, we weep
      PV/ta+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+12Pl: ta-mâtoyahk   # we and you cry, we and you wail, we and you weep
      PV/ta+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: ta-mâtoyîk   # you all cry, you all wail, you all weep
      PV/ta+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ta-mâtocik, ta-mâtotwâw]   # they cry, they wail, they weep
      PV/ta+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ta-mâtothit   # another/others cry, another/others wail, another/others weep
      PV/ta+mâtow+V+AI+Cnj+X: [ta-mâtonâniwik, ta-mâtonâniwahk, ta-mâtohk]   # someone cries, someone wails, someone weeps
      

      # Fut # Cond
      mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: mâtoyâni   # when I cry, when I wail, when I weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: [mâtoyani, mâtoyini]   # when you cry, when you wail, when you weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mâtoci   # when he/she cries, when he/she wails, when he/she weeps
      mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: mâtoyâhki   # when we cry, when we wail, when we weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: mâtoyahki   # when we and you cry, when we and you wail, when we and you weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: mâtoyîko   # when you all cry, when you all wail, when you all weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mâtotwâwi   # when they cry, when they wail, when they weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: mâtothici   # when another/others cry, when another/others wail, when another/others weep
      mâtow+V+AI+Fut+Cond+X: [mâtohki, mâtohkwâwi]   # when someone cries, when someone wails, when someone weeps
      

      # Imp # Imm
      mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mâto   # (you) cry now, (you) wail now, (you) weep now
      mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mâtotân   # let you and us cry now, let you and us wail now, let you and us weep now
      mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mâtok   # (you all) cry now, (you all) wail now, (you all) weep now
      

      # Imp # Del
      mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mâtohkan   # (you) cry later, (you) wail later, (you) weep later
      mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mâtohkahk   # let you and us cry later, let you and us wail later, let you and us weep later
      mâtow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mâtohkîk   # (you all) cry later, (you all) wail later, (you all) weep later
      
